Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.211

Ordinances—Style—Requisites—Veto.

The enacting clause of all ordinances in a second-class city shall be as follows: "The city council of the city of . . . . . . do ordain as follows:"

No ordinance shall contain more than one subject and that must be clearly expressed in its title.

No ordinance or any section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the new ordinance sets forth the revised ordinance or the amended section at full length.

No ordinance and no resolution or order shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the votes of at least four councilmembers.

No ordinance shall take effect until five days after the date of its publication unless otherwise provided in this title.

Every ordinance which passes the council in order to become valid must be presented to the mayor; if the mayor approves it, the mayor shall sign it, but if not, the mayor shall return it with written objections to the council and the council shall cause the mayor's objections to be entered at large upon the journal and proceed to a reconsideration thereof. If upon reconsideration five members of the council voting upon a call of yeas and nays favor its passage, the ordinance shall become valid notwithstanding the mayor's veto. If the mayor fails for ten days to either approve or veto an ordinance, it shall become valid without the approval of the mayor.

Every ordinance shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk.

[ 1994 c 81 s 43; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.210. Prior: (i) 1915 c 184 s 11, part; 1891 c 156 s 2; 1890 p 182 s 114; RRS s 9124, part. (ii) 1915 c 184 s 12, part; 1893 c 70 s 4; 1890 p 182 s 116; RRS s 9125, part. (iii) 1915 c 184 s 18, part; 1890 p 186 s 118; RRS s 9132, part. Formerly RCW 35.24.210.]

NOTES:

Codification of city or town ordinances: RCW 35.21.500 through 35.21.570.